Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1923.04
Residency requirements for family child care home II; prohibited.

No political subdivision shall institute residency requirements for a family child care home II. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a political subdivision from regulating business use relating to outside appearance, nuisances, or public health and safety.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 29.
July 18, 2026